Utah statutes.
63I-4a-303.   Governor to require review of commercial activities.

The governor may:

(1)  select one or more commercial activities that are being performed by an agency for examination; and

(2)  require the Governor's Office of Management and Budget to conduct the examination and make the determinations and recommendations described in Subsections 63I-4a-203(1)(a), (c), and (d).



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 325, 2013 General Session

